South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H5248.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 56-1-140(A) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (A) Upon payment of a fee of twenty-five dollars for a license that is valid for eight years, the department shall issue to every qualified applicant a driver's license as applied for by law.  The license must bear on it a distinguishing number assigned to the licensee, the full name, date of birth, residence address, a brief description and unobstructed photograph of the licensee's face, any marking otherwise required or in compliance with law, and a facsimile of the signature of the licensee.  No license is valid until it has been so signed by the licensee. Qualified applicants who are not citizens of the United States must have "Limited Term" conspicuously included on the drivers' licenses or identification cards issued to them. The license authorizes the licensee to operate only those classifications of vehicles as indicated on the license. SECTION 2.  Section 7-13-710(A) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (A) When a person presents himself to vote, he shall produce a valid and current: (1) South Carolina driver's license that does not contain the words "Limited Term"; or (2) other form of identification containing a photograph issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles, provided, that it does not contain the words "Limited Term"; or (3) passport; or (4) military identification containing a photograph issued by the federal government; or (5) South Carolina voter registration card containing a photograph of the voter pursuant to Section 7-5-675. SECTION 3.  Section 56-1-230 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 56-1-230.  Whenever any (A) A person after applying for or receiving a driver's license or identification card, must notify the Department of Motor Vehicles within ten days of: (1) shall movemoving permanently from the address named in such application or inon the license or identification card issued to him; (2) or when the name of a licensee is changedlegally changing his name by marriage or otherwise,; or (3) becoming a citizen of the United States after once providing the Department of Motor Vehicles with documentation that he was not a citizen of the United Statessuch person shall within ten days thereafter notify the Department of Motor Vehicles in writing of his old and new address or of such former and new name and of the number of any license then held by him. (B) The Department of Motor Vehicles may require documentation supporting the applicable change before applying the requested change. (C) In instances of a change pursuant to subsection (A), the department must provide one driver's license or identification card reflecting the applicable change per issuance cycle at no charge. Subsequent modified cards are at the expense of the person for the same fee provided in Section 56-1-200 or 56-1-3350, as applicable. SECTION 4.  SECTIONS 1 and 2 of this act take effect upon approval by the Governor. SECTION 3 of this act takes effect one year after approval by the Governor. ----XX----